src/fst/syllabification/hyphenation.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================== !
! Hyphenator for Inari Saami !
! ========================== !

! This file is based upon the North Saami one, and might be
! cleaned up here and there.

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö |
             A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö |
             é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | 
             É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | 
             ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý
             Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

! smn diphthongs: /iä/, /ie/, /uo/, /uá/, /ye/, ==> 2ndVow = ä, á, e, o
! smn loanword diphthongs: neutralistiđ, fauna, leutnánta

define 2ndVow [ e | i | u | o | á | ä | 
                E | I | U | O | Á | Ä ] ;

!define 3dVow [ u | U ] ;


define VowNot2ndVow   [ Vow - 2ndVow ] ;

!define VowNot3dVow   [ Vow - 3dVow ] ;


define U   [ u | U ] ;
define O   [ o | O ] ;
define A   [ a | A ] ;
define E   [ e | E ] ;
define I   [ i | I ] ;
define Y   [ y | Y ]  ;
define EO  [ e | E | o | O ] ;
define EOA [ e | E | o | O | a | A ] ;
define IAO [ i | I | a | A | o | O ] ;
define Oslash   [ ø | Ø ] ; ! Renamed from Ø to avoid non-ASCII chars
define UI  [ u | U | i | I ] ;
! what about á, ä, â ?

define UAAdipht     [ u á | U á | U Á ] ;
define IEdipht      [ i e | I e | I E ] ;
define UOdipht      [ u o | U o | U O ] ;
!define EAdipht      [ e a | E a | E A ] ;
!define OAdipht      [ o a | O a | O A ] ;
!define OUdipht      [ o u | O u | O U ] ; ! jour-na-lis-sta
define AUdipht      [ a u | A u | A U ] ; ! fau-na, Lauv-sjø-vo-la, Kår-ve-jau-re ok.
define EUdipht      [ e u | E u | E U ] ; ! leut-nán-ta
!define AEdipht      [ a e | A e | A E ] ; ! lae-sta-di-us,
!define OslashYdipht [ ø y | Ø y | Ø Y ] ; ! nøyt-rála  ! Renamed from ØYdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define OEdipht      [ o e | O e | O E ] ; ! goe-the
define IOslashdipht [ i ø | I ø | I Ø ] ; ! skiøld     ! Renamed from IØdipht to avoid non-ASCII chars
define IOdipht      [ i o | I o | I O ] ; ! skiold, nation
define IAEdipht     [ i ä | I ä | I Ä ] ; ! iä
define YEdipht      [ y e | Y e | Y E ] ; ! kye-li



!define EAUtripht [ e a u | E a u | E A U ] ; !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
!define IEUtripht [ i e u | I e u | I E U ] ; !Nieu-siedler



define dipht [ IEdipht | UAAdipht | UOdipht | AUdipht |
               EUdipht | OEdipht | IOslashdipht | IOdipht |
               IAEdipht | YEdipht ] ;

!define tripht [ EAUtripht | IEUtripht ] ;

define VowNotU      [ Vow - U   ] ;
define VowNotO      [ Vow - O   ] ;
define VowNotA      [ Vow - A   ] ;
define VowNotE      [ Vow - E   ] ;
define VowNotI      [ Vow - I   ] ;
define VowNotEO     [ Vow - EO  ] ;
define VowNotEOA    [ Vow - EOA ] ;
define VowNotIAO    [ Vow - IAO ] ;
define VowNotY      [ Vow - Y   ] ;
define VowNotOslash [ Vow - Oslash   ] ;  ! Renamed from VowNotØ to avoid non-ASCII chars
define VowNotUI     [ Vow - UI  ] ;
define LongVow      [ a a | e e | i i | o o | u u | á á | ä ä | ö ö ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ |
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ;

define S    [ S | s | Š | š ] ;
define Cnss [ Cns - S ] ;
define Sgm  [ Cns | Vow ] ;


!define Cns [ Cnssymb | Vow i ] ;

echo << Rules>>

define afterlong   [..] -> %^ ||                LongVow Cns* _ Cns Vow ;
define beforedipht [..] -> %^ ||      Vow                    _ dipht ;  !a^ie, e^ao, o^uo, u^ea etc! Any diphth, bled by savetripht later on.
define nodipht     [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow                    _ VowNot2ndVow (Sgm) ; !e^å, e^ä etc
!define notripht   [..] -> %^ ||  Cns Vow     VowNot2ndVow   _ U (Sgm) ; ! Not needed?
define NotOslhYdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotOslash   _ Y (Sgm) ; !a^y, e^y etc
define NotOAdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEO       _ A (Sgm) ; !i^a, u^a etc
define NotXUdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotEOA      _ U (Sgm) ; !y^u, i^u etc
define NotUOdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotUI       _ O (Sgm) ; !a^o, i^o etc
define NotIEdipht  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotIAOE     _ E (Sgm) ; ! u^e etc
define NotIOslhdi  [..] -> %^ || [Cns|Vow %-] VowNotI   _ Oslash (Sgm) ; !i^a, i^u etc
define 4cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow Cns         _ s t r               Vow ,
                                 Vow     k s     _ p [ l | r | s | n ] Vow ;

! 4cns: ham-strata, aks-pra
! FUOM: čállinrávvagat: 
! Giellalávdegoddi lea dolin mearridan ahte dj, hj, hl, lj, hm, hn, nj, ja hr
! ii galgga juohkit, danin go dát bustávat čállojuvvojit oktii ja dain 
! guðesge dušše okta konsonántajietnadat. Dán mearrádusa berret mii du
! nu ahte go fal lea vejolaš, de ii berre daid juohkit.
! Go gemináhtakonsonánttaid galgá dábálaččat juohkit guovtte sadj
! ái, de ii leat vuogas sáni juohkit ná: da-hje, čái-hni, bea-lje-sku-h
! ran. Maiddái dáid sániid berre juohkit váldonjuolggadusa miel
! de: dah-je, čáih-ni, beal-je-skuh-ran.

define longdiphthong [..] -> %^ || dipht _ [ [ [đ|l|r] f ] 
                                           | [ [đ|g]  g ] 
                                           | [ [l|r]   g ] 
                                                           ] i [ s t | j (d|n) | h ] .#. ;
                                                         
define palatal     [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) Cns _ d j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ l j ,
                                 Vow (Cns) Cns _ n j ;

define s2cnswg     [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ] [s|š] Cnss ( %> ) _ Cnss ( %> ) Vow ; !máist^tán
define 3cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]       Cns  ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !biil^la
!define foreign    [..] -> %^ || Vow                        ( %> ) _ g r         Vow ; !para^gráfa
define xcns        [..] -> %^ || x                          ( %> ) _      ( %> ) Vow ; !sex^a
define 2cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow [ Cns | i ]            ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !áh^ku
define 1cns        [..] -> %^ || Vow                        ( %> ) _ Cns  ( %> ) Vow ; !jo^ga


! The philosophy here is to remove some boundaries who, when seen also in a left
! context, are parts of triphthongs, and thus should not be divided. We do it
! via restoring, in order not to mess up our diphthong rules.

define savetripht  %^ -> 0 || e _ a u ;  ! does  work... !Bor-deaux, Beau-fort
define savetripht2 %^ -> 0 || i _ e u ;  ! does  work... !Nieu-siedler
define savetripht3 %^ -> 0 || i _ o u ;  ! does  work... !Sioux

! NB! smn has long vowels, these are needed.
define saveaa      %^ -> 0 || a _ a ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveii      %^ -> 0 || i _ i ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveuu      %^ -> 0 || u _ u ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveoo      %^ -> 0 || o _ o ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveöö      %^ -> 0 || ö _ ö ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveyö      %^ -> 0 || y _ ö ;    ! does  work... !työläinen Finnish
define saveyy      %^ -> 0 || y _ y ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveee      %^ -> 0 || e _ e ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish
define saveää      %^ -> 0 || ä _ ä ;    ! does  work... !alaamasta Finnish


define removedouble  %^ -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble2 %^ -> 0 || _ %- ;
define removedouble3 %# -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble4 %# -> 0 || _ %- ;

define readablehyphen %^ -> %- ;

echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [
!notripht
!.o.
afterlong
.o. beforedipht
.o. nodipht
.o. NotOslhYdi
.o. NotOAdipht
.o. NotXUdipht
.o. NotUOdipht
.o. NotIEdipht
.o. NotIOslhdi
.o. 4cns
!.o. unvoiced
.o. longdiphthong ! testing 
!.o. unvoicedwg
.o. palatal
!.o. s2cns
.o. s2cnswg
.o. 3cns
!.o. foreign
.o. xcns
.o. 2cns
.o. 1cns
.o. savetripht
.o. savetripht2
.o. savetripht3
.o. saveaa
.o. saveii
.o. saveuu
.o. saveoo
.o. saveöö
.o. saveyö
.o. saveyy
.o. saveee
.o. saveää
.o. removedouble
.o. removedouble2
.o. removedouble3
.o. removedouble4
!.o. readablehyphen
 ] ;



! If you want to compile this outside the make system, run the following:
! xfst -e "source < hyphenation.xfscript"
! invert net 
! save h.fst 
! quit 
! As a result, a temporary h.fst file will be saved, it can be called
! with e.g. "lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 h.fst", or in a pipe.
